Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,271
Commission; powers.

The commission shall have all powers necessary to carry out the functions and duties specified in sections 81-8,262 to 81-8,271, including power to establish advisory committees on special subjects, to receive or apply for and receive gifts, grants, contributions, and other funds from the federal government, private agencies, affiliated associations, and individuals, and to contract with public and private groups to conduct its business.

Laws 1972, LB 1081, § 10;

Laws 1983, LB 83, § 2.